Various duties for the Voyage before us, got
the Canoe ready and sent off to the Kullyspel Lake
m. with Furrs and Provisions, the weather variable, but
very mild. April 9. 5 am +38 2 pm +52 9 pm +42
small Rain. April 18. 5 am +38 Clear 2 pm +71 hazy.
9 PM +38 calm. Getting all ready to set off the morrow
19. We left the House to proceed on our Voyage to exchange
the Furrs for Goods c. The 25 part of this day
was passed in observations for Latitude Longitude and Variation
of the Compass, of no use to the general reader. The
same on the 26, when we had the good fortune to kill one
Crane, thirteen Geese and one Duck. April 27 proceeded
on discovery down the Spokane River till 2.25 pm, when
finding the River bounded by high craigs, of contracted
space, with strong rushes of current, small Falls, and Whirlpools,
we put ashore to examine the country below us. Of
late a great change had taken place, the remains of the heavysnows
of Winter, which is very deep in these countries, is
everywhere on the ground giving everything a wintry appearance
; we landed on the left side which appeared the best,
went up a high steep bank of rocks and earth, and then
through small, close woods, for one mile in deep snow, which
sometimes bore us up, but often we sunk in it to our middle;
we were obliged to haul ourselves out by the branches of the
Trees. Having crossed the Carrying Place, we had a steep
bank to go down from the top I surveyed the country
before me, with the assistance of the Indian a bold range
of high Mountains covered with snow bounded the left side
of the River, and also formed it's banks in rude craigs the
right side was of high steep Hills of rock, and ranged away
to a great distance. My Guide who has been here pointed
out the country about three miles below us was a Fall
that fell over steep Rocks, the height of a large tree say
80 to 100 feet but could not be approached in this season,
the Snow was too deep in the Summer they left the Canoes
a short distance above the Fall, and by hands and feet got
along the steep Rocks to the Fall, beyond which no Indian
had ever gone, except a very few to gather red ochre, which
is oftains. The road he described as highly dangerous, passable
only to light, active, men, and they are obliged frequently
to go on hands and knees, and thus get up the high steep
rocks which he assured us continued for two and a half
days march beyond the great Fall when they came on the
Columbia River. The Spokane River for this distance is a
terrible Cataract, bounded on each side by high Craigs, and
unnavigable those who voyage this way make a long carrying
place to a small River which runs nearly paralel to the
Columbia, and falls into it below the Cataract this River
he said to be too shoal for us. Although so near the Great
Falls, he assured us, it would take a whole day to arrive
there, including the Carrying Place we were on this I
readily believed, as the Carrying Place alone would require
four hours of active men. This range of rude, high, rocky
Hills gave me a view of the structure of the country which I
had not had before. I never to myself, could account for the
small quantity of Snow at the west foot of the Mountains along
the whole of the Kootanae and Saleesh countries for the length
of about 400 miles these high Hills intercepted all the
heavy vapours from the Pacific Ocean, and the great valley
between them and the west foot of the mountains have only
the light vapours which pass above these Hills the breadth
of this fine valley is irregular, and may be estimated at one
hundred miles the depth of snow on these Hills in Winter
must be very great when we found so much, so late in the
season, after such heavy thaws. I now perceived the Columbia
River was in a deep valley at the north end of these rude
Hills, and it's west side the high rolling lands of Amount
and considering all the information I had collected from
various Indians, I concluded that we must abandon all
thoughts of a passage this way, and return by our old Road,
till some future opportunity shall point out a more eligible
road, which I much doubt Near 5 pm began our return
and put up at pm. And I observed for Latitude. Killed
one Swan, one Crane, two Geese and found sixteen goose
eggs in different nests. The Crane was fat. In many places
there is much snow along the beach, and it is deep in the
woods. Such is the nature of this region.
May 1st. Came to my Men who are finishing a Canoe,
and told them to look for more Birch Rind and white Cedar
to make another Canoe we continued our journey to pm,
the River always from three to five hundred yards wide.
Our hunt to-day was one Antelope, three Geese and one
Duck. The great depth of snow on this end of the Road,
and the weak state of the Horses, put me in mind of a Rivulet
which we had to cross on the Carrying Place to McGiUivray's
River and by proceeding up it, shorten the distance for the
Horses, and avoid the worst part of the deep snow we found
the sortie of the Rivulet, and on the 3rd by proceeding up
it we came to the Road On the 16th with much suffering
and hard Labor we got all the Furrs to McGiUivray's River,
where our Canoes of last year were laid up and which we had
to repair, for which purpose all we could procure was nine
feet of second rate Birch Rind May. We got the
Canoes repaired, and in the afternoon with forty six packs
of Furrs, and eight bags of Pemmecan they went off for the
Rocky Mountain defiles. Mr Jas McMillan, one Man and
myselfHorses to the Saleesh Carrying Place to the Saleesh River;
and then returned for the rest of their cargoe of Furrs, with
which they arrived. On the 9th June, thank God, we arrived
safe at McGilivray's Carrying Place, which leads to the
scource of the Columbia River and crossed all the Horses,
they are in poor condition, the grass scant, and bruised
in the many rapids we have crossed to this place we now
go direct for the defiles of the Rocky A4ountains. When we
landed we saw the fresh tracks of Peeagan Scouts, they had
this morning broken the branch of an Aspin Tree, and peeled
the bark, on examining the tracks, we found they had gone
up the River to recross the Mountains. Had we been a few
hours sooner, we should have had to fight a battle, which,
thank God, is thus avoided.
June 16th. Early came to the Carrying Place of the
Mountains Our Hoard strongly built of Pine Logs, and
covered with Pine Bark, we found cut through by a
Wolverene, whom we killed he had eaten twenty five pounds
of Pemmican, half of a dressed leather Skin, three pairs of
Shoes, and cut to pieces seven large Saddles and broken the
Pine Bark covering to pieces this animal is everywhere a
devil for mischief. Left Mr McMillan and four Men in
charge of the Furrs, and to wait fresh Horses from the east
end of the Defile We were in hopes of seeing Men and
Horses here to cross the Furrs, but suppose the Snow is too
deep but necessity compels me to proceed to the east end
of the Defile for fresh Horses with seven M
left on the iS we crossed the Height of Land, and our
jaded Horses got free of the Snow Early on the 19''' came
to the Men in charge of the Horses, they were waiting for
the Snow to almost disappear. Giving them all the dried
Provisions I had, sent them off with all the fresh Horses to
Mr McMillan, who is in charge of the Furrs. We went to
where the large canoe was laid up, found it very little damaged,
repaired it, and with three Men, and Pembok a Chippeway
Indian an hour after Noon we embarked on the rapid,
sinuous, stream of the head of the great Saskatchewan River;
and put up at the lower end of the Kootanae Plains as we
are now in the land of the Bison we hope no more to be in
want of Provisions. Pembok went a hunting and killed a
Bison BuU of which he brought us about twenty pounds, bull
meat is not regarded, it is seldom fat, and always tough.
June 20. Early we gummed the Canoe, made a Seat
for the two men, Boisverd steered the Canoe, and two men
paddled, the Indian sat in the middle of the Canoe, and I
took the Bow, as the most experienced on rapid Rivers. The
melting of the Snow in the Mountains had increased the
current to a torrent, on every rock, snag, or root of a tree
the water was like a fall, the men paddled merely sufficient
to give the Canoe steerage way we were descending with
careless gaiety, when within four inches of the canoe, a large
sawyer of 18 inches diameter arose, which gave us a fright
that put an end to our cheerfulness, for a blow from such a
tree would have dashed the canoe to pieces. A Sawyer, for
want of a greek name is a large tree torn from the Banks by
the current, and floated down to some place too shoal to allow
the Root to pass, here it rests, but the tree itself is in the
current below it, it's buoyancy makes it float, but being fast
the current buries it, to a certain depth, from which the
elasticity and lightness of the wood causes it to rise like the
spring of a Bow again it is buried, and again rises, and thus
continues to
it's way, until the water lowers, and becomes too shoal. I
once saw a Bison Bull across a small Sawyer, it had come up
and taken him under the Belly, his weight kept it from much
play, he was swiming with all his might his fore legs on one
side, and his hind legs on the other, and the Sawyer dodging
him up and down gave us a hearty laugh had it been a
Deer, we might have relieved him, but the Bison is so savage,
that he is never pitied, get into what mischief he will. Our
hunt to-day, a Bison Bull, one Red Deer, and wounded a
Mountain Sheep, we camped at the foot of the high Craigs
of Limestone, to be free of an attack from the Peeagan
Indians.
deserted, it is situated on a high dry bank, as well built as
possible with Logs of wood, and now in ruins it is a strange
fact that of all pine log buildings they are in ruins a few
months after they cease to be inhabited, however dry the
ground and the climate.
We had now full five hundred miles to descend this noble
river Saskatchewan where it passes through the great Plains,
with woods only in places, the very country of the Bison,
the Red Deer and the Antelopes. As we descended many
herds of the Bison were crossing as the whim took them.
They swim well, though slowly, and however troublesome the
Flies, they never like the Deer shelter themselves under
water, but roll themselves on the ground to get rid of them:
It is remarked that all land Animals when killed in the water
do float and all aquatic, as the Beaver, Otter and Musk
Rat, do sink in the water when shot, and have to be laid
hold of as soon as possible, or they are lost At this season
the Bison Bulls are fatter than the Cows, we preferred them,
and when swiming they are shot in the head close under
the ear, one of them so shot to our surprise sunk like a stone
and we had to kill another thus we held on to where the
Forests close on the River, and the Bison is no longer seen,
nothing now to amuse us, but myriads of Musketoes and
Horse flies to vex us, and allow no rest night nor day.
This turbid River has formed immense alluvials of about
two hundred miles in width to the Cedar Lake, through
which it passes in several Channels this very rich soil is
much covered with Reeds and rushes, but where the lands
have graduallythis has taken place the Moose Deer have taken possession.
On the west side of these alluvials is Cumberland Lake, on
the east bank of which is situated Cumberland House in
N Longitude 102.13 West. This House
was the first inland trading post the Hudson's Bay Companymade,
remarkably well situated for the trade of fine Furrs:
it serves as the general Depot for all the dried Provisions made
of the meat and fat of the Bison under the name of Pemican,
a wholesome, well tasted nutritious food, upon which all
persons engaged in the Furr Trade mostly depend for their
subsistence during the open season it is made of the lean
and fleshy parts of the Bison dried, smoked, and pounded
fine in this state it is called Beat Meat the fat of the Bison
is of two quahties, called hard and soft the former is from
the inside of the animal, which when melted is called hard
fat properly grease the latter is made from the large flakes
of fat that He on each side the back bone, covering the ribs,
and which is readily separated, and when carefully melted
resembles Butter in softness and sweetness. Pimmecan is
made up in bags of ninety pounds weight, made of the parchment
hide of the Bison with the hair on the proportion of
the Pemmecan when best made for keeping is twenty pounds
of soft and the same of hard fat, slowly melted together, and
at a low warmth poured on fifty pounds of Beat Meat, well
mixed together, and closely packed in a bag of about thirty
inches in length, by near twenty inches in breadth, and
about four in thickness which makes them flat, the best shape
for stowage and carriage. On the great Plains there is a
shrub bearing a very sweet berry of a dark blue color, much
sought after, great quantities are dried by the Natives in
this state, these berries are as sweet as the best currants, and
as much as possible mixed to make Pemmecan the wood of
this shrub, or willow is hard, weighty and flexible, but
Arrow of the Indian, the native name is Mis-sars-cut to
which mee-nar is added for the berry we call it by the
native name, but the french who murder every foreign word
call the Berry, Poires, and Pim-me-carn Peemittegar. I
have dwelt on the above, as it the staple food of all
persons, and affords the most nourishment in the least space
and weight, even the gluttonous french Canadian that devours
eight pounds of fresh meat every day is contented with one
and a half pound p day it would be admirable provision
for the Army and Navy. It is at Cumberland House all the
Pimmecan, and dried provisions of all kinds procured from
the great Plains are brought down the Saskatchewan and
deposited here, and which forms the supply for the furr
Traders going to, and coming from, all the trading Posts;
By receiving the turbid waters of the Saskatchewan it has
remarkably fine Sturgeon, a fish that requires such water to
be in perfection.
The Cedar Lake is fast fiUing up with alluvial matter, but
has yet twenty eight miles of width, which we crossed. This
Lake takes it's name from the small Cedar Wood growing on
it's banks, and which is not found further north or eastward.
The shores of this Lake is of Limestone on both sides from
this Lake there is a descent of five miles of Rapids to Cross
Lake, which has a width of three miles, and a length of nine
miles in rapids and Falls, is the discharge into Lake Winepeg
Sea Lake the last two miles is a carrying place the whole
of this is Limestone, and forms it's eastern termination;
coasting sixty eight miles of the north end of this Lake, the
River again forms, but the whole of the country is now of
granitic formation, and continues such to the vicinity of
Hudson's BayFrom the Lake Winepeg it proceeds 107 miles
forming
twenty eight Falls, with 8183 yards of carrying everything
at these Falls and the banks of the River the descent of the
River in this last 177 miles is 1580 feet. From where it is
first navigable for a Canoe in the Mountains to it's entrance
into the Sea it's length is 1725 miles, and this River drains
an area of country of 426,529 square miles, the western parts
to the Mountains are very fine countries. This was formerly
my route from, and to, Hudson's Bay, but our course is along
the west side of this large Lake for 194 miles to the sortie of
the Winepeg River. The shores of all this distance is of
Limestone, and the interior country a fine soil. The area of
this Lake is full 14,600 Square Miles. Here is another Depot
of Provisions of the Pimmecan and other dried Provisions from
the Red, the Swan, and Dauphin Rivers which flow into
this Lake on it's west side. The Winepeg River has its
scources on the north side of the heights of Lake Superior,
small streams, which find and make. Lakes, and accumulate
water, some of considerable size, are the Rainy Lake and Lake
of the Woods. This range of country has a great descent,
the River as it proceeds from Lake to Lake has many Falls and
carrying places. We ascended the River Winepeg 130 miles,
carrying over it's 33 falls, 5691 with a descent of 314 feet
and a distance of 82 miles, to the Lake of the Woods over
which we went to the Rainy River, and up this fine River,
to near the Rainy Lake, where is an old established trading
Post and Depot of Merchandize and Provisions of Maize c.
and where, thank God, we arrived safely on the 22nd of July.
Although this whole distance is a granite formation, yet
the soil is a rich loam, tending to clay, and yields a good return
of Wheat and Barley, of cabbages c so far
a Lady Conjuress made her appearance. She was well
dressed of twenty five years of age, she had her Medicine
Bag, and bore in her hands a conjuring stick about feet in
length at the foot and three inches at the top,
by one inch in thickness, one side was painted black, with rude
carved figures of Birds Animals and Insects filled with vermillion
; the other side was painted red with carved figures
in black, she had set herself up for a prophetess, and gradually
had gained, by her shrewdness, some influence among the
Natives as a dreamer, and expounder of dreams, she recollected
me, before I did her, and gave me a naughty look of defiance,
as much as to say I am now out of your power. Some six
years before this she was living with one of my men as his wife,
but became so common that I had to send her to her relations
; as all the Indian men are married, a courtesan is
neglected by the men and hated by the Women. She had
turned Prophetess for a livelihood, and found fools enough
to support her there is scarce a character in civiHzed society
that has not something like it among these rude people
Two canoes of Chippaway Indians came to us on their
way to the Red Cedar Lake As my Canoe from
coming too often in contact with the ice was Leaky
I embarked with them to the Red Cedar Lake. From the
SW corner of the Turtle Lake a Brook goes out, by the name
of the Turtle Brook of three yards in width by two feet in
depth at but so very winding, that rather
than follow it we made a Carrying Place of 18o yards, to a
small Lake which sends a Brook into it, and which we followed,
and then continued the main stream following its incredible
windings and turnings through apparently an extensive very
low country of grass and marsh.
There were three Falls, along which we made as many
carrying places, and several rapids over a gravel bottom As
we proceeded several Brooks came in from each hand, and we
entered the Red Cedar Lake in a fine Stream of fifteen yards
in width by two feet in depth, and three miles an hour. Proceeding
five miles over the Lake we came to the trading house
of M'John Sayer a Partner of the North West Company,
and in charge of this Department. By my Observations this
House is in Latitude 47.27.56 N Longitude 94.47.52 West
Variation 6 degrees East. From the north bank of Turtle
Lake to this trading house the course and distance S 58 E 25
Miles, but the windings of the River will more than treble
this distance. The Stream has a grassy valley in which it
holds it's zigzag course this land is very low. The Woods on
each side of the Valley are of Oak, Ash, Elm, Larch, Birch,
Pines, Aspins and where a little elevated fine Maple. The
soil every where deep and rich with abundance of long grass.
The Brooks and Ponds and the Turtle Rivulet almost from
side to side full of the Stalks of the Wild Rice, which makes
it very laborious to come against the current, as the canoe
must keep the middle of the stream against the full force of
the current. Mr Sayer and his Men had passed the whole
winter on wild rice and maple sugar, which keeps them aHve,
but poor in flesh Being a good shot on the wing I had killed
twenty large Ducks more than we wanted, which I gave to
him a most welcome present, as they had not tasted meat for
a long time. A mess of rice and sugar was equally acceptable
to me who had lived wholly on meat and I tried to hve
upon it, but the third day was attacked with heart burn and
weakness of the stomach, which two meals of meat cured;
but the rice makes good soup. From the remarks I have
made in the vicissitudes of my life, I have always found that
men leading an active life readily change their food from
vegetable to animal without inconvenience, but not from
animal to vegetable, the latter often attended with weakness
of the bowels.
The wild Rice is fully ripe in the early part of September.
The natives lay thin birch rind all over the bottom of the
Canoe, a man lightly clothed, or naked places himself in the
middle of the Canoe, and with a hand on each side, seizes
the stalks and knocks the ears of rice against the inside of the
Canoe, into which the rice falls, and thus he continues until
the Canoe is full of rice on coming ashore the Women assist
in unloading. A canoe may hold from ten to twelve bushels.
He smokes his pipe, sings a Song and returns to collect
another canoe load.
And so plentifull is the rice, an industrious Man may fill
his canoe three times in a day. Scaffolds are prepared about
six feet from the ground made of small sticks covered with
long grass on this the rice is laid, and gentle clear fires kept
underneath by the women, and turned until the rice is fully
dried. The quantity collected is no more than the scaffolds
can dry, as the rice is better on the stalk than on the ground.
The rice when dried is pounded in a mortar made of a piece
of hollow oak with a pestle of the same until the husk comes
off. It is then put up in bags made of rushes and secured
against animals. The Natives collect not only enough for
themselves, but also as much as the furr traders will buy
from them Two or three Ponds of water can furnish enough
for all that is collected.
In the Spring the Natives employ themselves in making
Sugar from the Maple Trees, the process of doing which is
well known. The old trees give a stronger sap than the young
trees The Canadians also make a great quantity, which,
when the sap is boiled to a proper consistence, they run into
moulds where it hardens. But the Indians prefer making it
like Muscovado sugar, this is done simply by stirring it quickly
about with a small paddle. The Plane Tree also makes a
good sugar, the sap is abundant, and the sugar whiter, but
not so strong. Both sugars have a taste, which soon becomes
agreeable, and as fine white loaf sugar can be made from it
as from that of the West Indies. The natives would make
far more than they do, if they could find a Market.
The men of family that trade at this House are about
Sixty, and Mr Sayer, who has been in the Furr Trade many
years, is of opinion that seven persons to a family is about a
fair average. This will give 420 souls. The Natives here call
themselves Oochepoys and for some few years have begun
to give something like a right of property to each family on
the sugar maple groves, and which right continues in the
family to the exclusion of others. But as this appropriated
space is small in comparison of the whole extent any, and
every person is free to make sugar on the vacant grounds.
The appropriation was made by them in a council, in order
to give to each family a full extent of ground for making
sugar, and to prevent the disputes that would arise where all
claim an equal right to the soil and it's productions. And as
in the making of sugar, several kettles and many small vessels
of wood and birch rind for collecting and boiling the sap are
required, which are not wanted for any other purpose, they
are thus left in safety on their own grounds for future use.
Our Canoe being in very bad order from rough usage
among the ice Mr Sayer purchased a good canoe for us for
the value of twenty beaver skins in goods and our Canoe. It
was my intention to have gone a considerable distance down
the River, but Mr Sayer strongly advised me to go no
further than to Sand Lake River, as beyond we should be in
the power of the Sieux Indians. 
On the third day of Maywe took leave of our kind host our provisions were wild
rice and maple sugar, with powder and shot for ducks. One
mile beyond the house we entered the River, now augmented
to twenty six yards in width by three feet in depth, at two
miles an hour. The valley of the Mississippe lay now clear
before me, it's direction South East it's appearance was that
of a meadow of long half dried grass without water of about
half a mile in width, or less. On the left side points of wood
came to the edge of this valley, but not into it, at a mile,
or a mile and a half from each other, the intervals were bays
of hay marsh. On the right hand the Hne of Woods was
more regular Being well experienced in taking levels, the
Valley of the River before us showed a declining plane of full
twenty p mile for the first three miles this would give a
current which no boat could ascend but this was completely
broken down by the innumerable turnings of the
River to every point of the compass. Seeing a Pole before
us at less than five hundred yards the four hands in the canoe
paddled smartly for thirty five minutes before a current of
2i miles an hour to arrive at it, in which time we estimated
we had passed over about three miles of the windings of the
River. Meeting an Indian in his canoe ascending the River,
he smoked with us, and on my remarking to him the crookedness
of the River, he shook his head, and said Snake make this
River. I thought otherwise, for these windings break the
current and make it navigable. I have always admired the
formations of the Rivers, as directed by the finger of God
for the most benevolent purposes.
At 7 PM we put up in Lake Winepegoos formed by the
waters of this River. It's length is seventeen miles, by about
six miles in width, the principal fish is Sturgeon. The woods
have all day had much Fir, both red and black, the latter very
resinous and much used for torches for night fishing. The
soil of the Woods is now sandy with Points of alluvial, on
which are Oaks and other hard woods, and the bays have
White Cedar, Birch and Larch. On leaving the Lake the
valley of the River appeared more level.
On the 4th at noon put ashore to observe for latitude and
shortly after the River passing over a fine bottom of gravel,
I found the River to be 26 yards wide feet deep by
2f miles an hour. Nine miles below the Leach River from
Leach Lake, southwestward of us comes in, its size appears
equal to this River, which it deepens, but does not add to
it's breadth. For this day the valley of the River is from
half to one mile in width, on each side well wooded with fine
Firs.
May 5th. After proceeding two miles saw the first leaves
on the Willows the Maple and other Trees are in full bud,
but have no leaves. We came to a Rapid, and a Fall over a
smooth Rock of eight feet descent the whole is thirteen feet
perpendicular, with a Carrying Place of 263 yards. Six miles
further the Meadow River from the north eastward joins,
it's size and water equal to this, the Mississippe, which is
now fifty to sixty yards in breadth. We met a Man wounded
in the shoulder, in a quarrel with an other Man, his Wife was
paddling the Canoe; it appeared jealousy was the cause.
On the 6 May we continued our route: in the course of
the day we met an Indian and his Wife. The man had a large
fresh scar across his nose, and when smoking with us, asked if
he was not still handsome; on arriving at Sand Lake we
learned that the evening before, while drinking, another
Indian had quarrelled with him, and in a fit of jealousy had
bit off his nose and thrown it away, but in the morning finding
his nose was missing, he searched for, and found it, the part
that remained was still bleeding, on which he stuck the part
bitten off, without any thing to keep it adhered, and
taking a looking glass, he exclaimed, as yet I am not ugly.
I was afterwards informed, the cure became complete, and
only the scar remained. The Swan River from the north
eastward fell in with a bold stream of water. In the afternoon
at 5 PM we arrived at the mouth of the Sand Lake
River, a short distance above which I measured the Mississippe
River 62 yards in width 1 2 feet in depth at 4 yards from
the shore 10 feet, at two yards 8 feet in depth, by full two
miles an hour. The mouth of the Sand Lake River is in
Latitude 46 . 49 . 1 1 N Longitude 93 . 45 . 7 W and from the
Red Cedar Lake S 48 E 68 miles.
As the Mississippe is the most magnificent River, and
flows through the finest countries of North America, I shall
endeavour to explain the peculiar formation of its head
waters. From the Turtle to the Red Cedar Lake, the passage
was too much obstructed by ice to allow me to form a correct
idea of it's windings but from the latter Lake to the mouth
of the Sand Lake River there was no ice From the Red
Cedar Lake to the latter river is 68 miles direct distance to
perform which, four hands in a light Canoe paddled forty
three hours and thirteen minutes. Of this direct distance
ten miles were Lake, leaving fifty eight miles of River and
allowing three hours and thirteen minutes for passing the
Lake forty hours remain. Four hands in a light Canoe
before a current of two, and at times two and a half miles
an hour, will proceed, at least five miles an hour and this
rate for forty hours will give a distance of two hundred miles
of the windings of the river for fifty eight miles in a direct
line, being nearly three and a half miles to one mile. Every
mile of these sinuosities of the River, the current turned to
every point of the compass, and it's direct velocity was
diminished, yet continuing to have a steady current measured
at two full miles an hour, must have a descent of full twenty
inches p mile to maintain this current which in two hundred
miles gives a descent or
freshets and steady high water a volume equal to 19 J cubic
miles.
On the 6th day of May we arrived at the Sand Lake
River, up which we turn and bend our course for Lake
Superior. Since we left the Red River on the 9th day of
April we have not seen the track of a Deer, or the vestige of
a Beaver, not a single Aspin marked with it's teeth. The
Indians we met all appeared very poor from the animals
being almost wholly destroyed in this section of the country;
their provisions were of wild rice and sugar we did not see
a single duck in their canoes, ammunition being too scarce;
nor did we see a Bow and Arrows with them, weapons
which are in constant use among the Nahathaways for
killing all kinds of fowl they were bare footed and poorly
dressed.
The Sand Lake River is twenty yards wide, by five feet in
depth, at one and a half miles an hour. It's length two
miles to the Sand Lake, proceeding more than half a mile
we came to a trading house of the North West Company
under the charge of Mons Boiske. Here were the Women
and children of about twenty families, the Men were all
hunting in the Plains on the west side of the Mississippe to
make half dried meat, and procure skins for leather of the
Bison but the meat thus split and dried is very coarsely
done, and to make it something decent, it has to pass through
the hands of the Women. These people can only dress the
hide of the Bison into leather but have not the art of dressing
it with the hair on, to make Robes of it, so usefull for cloathing
and bedding. As the Men were hunting on what is
called the War Grounds, that is, the debatable lands between
them and the Sieux Indians, the Women were anxiously
waiting their arrival. The night being fine, as usual I was
his furrs came from the Forests between the Mississippe and
Lake Superior.
He had traded i6 Cwt of Maple Sugar from the Natives;
this was packed in baskets of birch rind of 28 to 68 lbs each.
The Sugar appeared clean and well made that of the Plane
Trees, looked like the East India Sugars, and was much the
same in taste In this article I have always noticed the supplyis
greater than the demand. The Men of family that trade
here are about forty two, which at seven souls to each man,
is 294.
We had now to cross the country to gain the River St.
Louis, and by it descend to Lake Superior. Our Provisions
were four pieces of dried bison meat four beaver tails and
two quarts of swamp cranberries, they were the largest I had
ever seen, being about the size of a small hazel nut.
This trading house is in Latitude 46 . 46 . 30 N Longitude
93 . 44 . 17 West Variation 6 degrees East.
On the May went over the Sand Lake of four miles
in length, by about one mile in width to Savannah Brook,
up which we proceeded eight geo. miles of which i mile is
a large Pond, but the windings lengthen the Brook to thirteen
miles, to a great Swamp of 4-i- miles across it in a N 81 E
direction, the latter part of what may be termed bog over
which we passed by means of a few sticks laid lengthways,
and when we shpped off we sunk to our waists, and with
difficulty regained our footing on the sticks. No Woods grow
on this great Swamp, except scattered pine shrubs of a few
feet in height yet such as it was, we had to carry our Canoe
and all our things. And all the furrs, provisions, baggage
and Canoes of the Mississippe have to be carried on their
way to the Depot on Lake Superior, and likewise all the
goods for the winter trade. It is a sad piece of work. The
Person in charge of the brigade crosses it as fast as he can,
leaves the Men twith the packs of furrs, or pieces of goods, and sacre as
often as they please. Heavy Canoes cannot be carried over
but at great risque both to the Men and Canoes, and the
Company have Canoes at each end. This great Swamp,
extended as far as we could see northward and southward,
and I could not learn it's termination either way. It appears
to be somewhat like a height of land between the Mississippe
and the River S' Louis, as from it's west side it sends a brook
into the former and from it's east side a brook into the
latter.
With an extra Man to help us, it took us a long day to get all
across it. At the east end I observed for Latitude and Longitude
which gave Latitude 46 . 52 . 3 N Longitude 92 . 28 . 42 W
Variation 6 degrees east. We now entered a Brook of seven
feet wide, three feet deep, by two miles an hour, and descended
it for twelve miles, but it's windings will extend it to twenty
miles, in which distance it receives one brook from the southward,
and two from the northward, which increased it to
ten yards wide, seven feet deep by if miles an hour. We
now entered the River S' Louis, a bold stream of about one
hundred yards in width by eight feet in depth, the current
three miles an hour. Having descended the River 4 Miles
we put up at 7f pm. We have been all day in the Forests
that surrounded Lake Superior. The Brook of today has
many wind fallen trees across it, which we had to cut away.
In several places we saw the marks of beaver for the first
time. On examining a Swan  we shot, it had thirteen eggs,
from the size of a pea to that of a walnut, yet I do not
remember ever seeing more than nine young ones with them.
The Woods we have passed are a few Oaks of moderate size,
some Ash, but the principal part Maple, Plane, White Birch,
Poplar and Aspin on the low grounds. Pine and Larch.
Hitherto the width, depth and rate of current of the Brooks
and Rivers are those of high water from the melting of the
snow. But as all of them, even the Red River, depend on
the Snow and Rains for their supply of water in the months
of August, September and October they are all shoal. The
Men who have navigated these streams for several years are
now with me, and they assure me that this river S' Louis
bold and deep as it now is, in the above months has only
eighteen inches of depth, running among stones which they
are often obliged to turn aside to make a passage for their
canoes. In the night we heard a Beaver playing about us,
flapping his broad tail on the water, with a noise as loud as
the report of a small pistol, which was a novelty to us.
Upon descending the first rapids, and proceeding downwards,
the Men were surprised to find the marks on the trees,
to which they were accustomed to tie the Canoes at their
meals, to be from six to eight feet above the present level of
the River This may be accounted for, by our being on this
river about a month more early than usual, and the sharp
night frosts preventing the melting of the snow on the
heights and interiour of Lake Superior. This River has many
rapids, on one of which the waves filled the Canoe half full of
water These were succeeded by a Cataract of small low
steeps of a full mile in length round a point of rock, across
which we made a carrying place of 1576 yards. Four miles
further, of almost all rapids we came to the Long Carrying
Place of seven miles in length. On our left the River descends
the lower heights by a series of low falls, ending with a steep
fall, estimated at 120 feet in height, below which the River
flows with a moderate current into Lake Superior.
The surface rock of the country is a slaty sand stone, very
good for sharpening knives and axes. Near the mouth of the
River is a Trading House of the North West Company under
the charge of Mons Lemoine his returns were 600 lbs of
Furrs with the expectation of trading 400 lbs more 9 kegs
of gum from the Pine Trees for the Canoes and 12 Kegseach of ten gallons, of Sugar. This House is in Latitude
46 . 44 . 33 N Longitude 92 . 9 . 45 W Variation degrees East.
I have only set down my observations made at certain places,
but they are numerous all over the survey, as every clear day
and night, no opportunity was ommitted of taking observations
for Latitude, Longitude and Variation to correct the
courses and distances of the survey. The Canoes that descend
the River to the upper end of the Long Carrying Place, are
carefully laid up, and there left, in like manner the Canoes
that come from the Lake are left at the lower end. We
found three large Canoes, and a north Canoe of 28 feet in
length, much broken. This was too large for us, but we had
no choice, we repaired it, and as we had only three men fitted
it up with two oars, which have the force of four paddles, as
we had now to encounter the Winds and waves of Lake
Superior.
The Natives that trade at this House are about thirty
Men of family, and are about 210 souls. In Winter, from the
poverty of the country they can barely live, and a small
stock of sugar is part of their support. Deer are almost unknown,
and they are suppHed with leather, as with other
necessaries. In the open season their support is by fishing,
for which the spear is much in use. Their canoes are about
fifteen feet in length by three feet in breadth, and flat
bottomed With a Woman or a Lad to paddle and steer the
canoe, the Indian with his long spear, stands on the gunwales
at the bar behind the bow, and ticklish as the canoe is, and
the Lake almost always somewhat agitated, he preserves his
upright posture, as if standing on a rock. On the Lake,
especially in the fore part of the day, a low fog rises on the
surface of the water, caused by the coldness of the water
and the higher temperature of the air which hides the
Canoe and only the Indian Man, with his poised spear
each of ten gallons, of Sugar. This House is in Latitude
46 . 44 . 33 N Longitude 92 . 9 . 45 W Variation 4-i- degrees East.
I have only set down my observations made at certain places,
but they are numerous all over the survey, as every clear day
and night, no opportunity was ommitted of taking observations
for Latitude, Longitude and Variation to correct the
courses and distances of the survey. The Canoes that descend
the River to the upper end of the Long Carrying Place, are
carefully laid up, and there left, in like manner the Canoes
that come from the Lake are left at the lower end. We
found three large Canoes, and a north Canoe of 28 feet in
length, much broken. This was too large for us, but we had
no choice, we repaired it, and as we had only three men fitted
it up with two oars, which have the force of four paddles, as
we had now to encounter the Winds and waves of Lake
Superior.
The Natives that trade at this House are about thirty
Men of family, and are about 210 souls. In Winter, from the
poverty of the country they can barely live, and a small
stock of sugar is part of their support. Deer are almost unknown,
and they are suppHed with leather, as with other
necessaries. In the open season their support is by fishing,
for which the spear is much in use. Their canoes are about
fifteen feet in length by three feet in breadth, and flat
bottomed With a Woman or a Lad to paddle and steer the
canoe, the Indian with his long spear, stands on the gunwales
at the bar behind the bow, and ticklish as the canoe is, and
the Lake almost always somewhat agitated, he preserves his
upright posture, as if standing on a rock. On the Lake,
especially in the fore part of the day, a low fog rises on the
surface of the water, caused by the coldness of the water
and the higher temperature of the air which hides the
Canoe and only the Indian Man, with his poised spearmade 431 feet equal to 1478 feet;
 the elevation of the
Turtle Lake, the scource of the Mississippe, above the Sea.
It is tedious to the reader to attend to these calculations
and yet to the enquiring mind they are necessary that he may
know the ground on which they are based. For the age of
guessing is passed away, and the traveller is expected to give
his reasons for what he asserts. To take the levels of several
hundred miles of Rivers is too expensive, unless there is some
great object in view, and all that the public can expect, or
obtain, in these almost unknown countries, are the estimates
of experienced men.
On Lake Superior a Volume could be written I have
been twice round it, and six times over a great part, each
survey correcting the preceding. The last survey of this Lake
was under the orders of the Foreign Office for to determine,
and settle the Boundary Line, between the Dominions of
Great Britain and the Territories of the United States. The
Courses were taken by the Compass, and the Distances by
Massey's Patent Log, the latter so exact, as to require very
little correction. The many astronomical observations made
have settled the exact place of the Shores of this great Lake:
the Maps of which, with the Boundary Line are in the Foreign
Office in London and also in the Office of the United States
at Washington, and are not published. The River St Louis
flows into it's west end and the discharge of the Lake is at
it's south east corner, by the Falls of S Maries, which are in
Latitude 46 . 31 . 16 North Longitude 84 . 13 . 54 W. giving the
straight course and distance, S 89 E 383 Miles, it's breadth
increases from the west to the east end, to 176 miles. It
has two great bays on it's east side, across which are many
Islands. The shores of the south side are 671 miles, and
those of the north and east sides 946 miles, being a circuit
of 1617 miles It's area is about 28,090 square miles. It's
level above the Sea is 625 feet. It's depth is as yet unknown,
even near the shores of Pye Island and the head land Thunder
Bay it has been sounded with 350 fathoms of Line, and no
bottom found and this by men experienced in taking soundings.
Supposing it's greatest depth to be only 400 fathoms
equal to 2400 feet, it's bottom is 1775 feet below the surface
of the Ocean.
Taking it's area at 28,090 square miles and its average
depth at 200 fathoms, this Lake contains 5930 cubic miles of
fresh water. All summer the water tastes very cold, and in
winter only the bays, and around the Islands are frozen,
which the waves of the frequent gales of wind break up,
and cause much floating ice. In easterly or westerly gales
of wind the roll of it's waves are like those of the sea . When
surveying this Lake in the year 1822 on the north side about
fifty miles eastward of S' Louis River, about i pm we put
ashore to dine, the day clear and fine and the Lake perfectly
calm as we were sitting on the Rocks, about a full mile
from us direct out in the Lake suddenly there arose an
ebullition of the water its appearance was that of a body
of water thrown up from some depth. It was about thirty
yards in length by four feet in height, it's breadth we could
not see, from within this the water was thrown up about
ten feet in very small columns as seen through our glasses.
To the eye it appeared like heavy rain the Lake became
agitated, the waves rolled on the shore and we had to secure
the Canoes, this lasted for about half an hour. I took a
sketch of it when it subsided, the waves still continued;
and we were for three hours unable to proceed. During this
time and the whole day the wind was calm. On the western
part of the south
are also the Islands some of the cliffs are much worn by the
waves, and have heaps of debris the Islands are in the
same state. One of them is worn through, and in calm
weather a canoe and men can pass with the arch three feet
above their heads.
Along the shore, proceeding eastward the limestone
appears and continues and seems everywhere to underlay the
sandstone. Everywhere the land rises boldly from the Lake
shore, and at the distance of about fifteen miles are crowned
by the Porcupine hills, lying parallel to the Lake and the
elevation of the land appears to be full 2500 feet above the
Lake the whole has the appearance of a continuous Forest,
and so far as the eye can judge may be cultivated. The north
and east sides of this Lake are very different from the south
side they rise abruptly in rude rounded shaped rock rolhng
back to the height of 850 to 2000 feet above the Lake at a
distance they appear to be one Forest but a nearer approach
shows many a place of bare rock. The whole extent of the
946 miles of this coast is of the granitic order, in all the
varieties that quartz, feltspar and mica can form with the
materials and offers a fine field for the geologist and mineralogist
; but in all this distance were ten Farmers to search for
a place where each could have a lot of 200 acres of good land
along side of each other I do not think they would find it.
In the north east corner of the Lake there is much Basalt,
the only place in which I have seen this mineral on the east
side of the Mountains. In this corner is Thunder Bay, so
named by the Natives from it's frequent occurrence. Off the
west point is Pye Island, so named from it's shape, it is of
Basalt, part of this Island has perpendicular sides of at least
100 feet in height close to which, the Lake has been sounded
with 350 fathoms of lead line and no bottom found We
may conclude the depth of the Lake to be here 400 fathoms,
which will give the Basalt walls of the Island 2500 feet in
height. The east end of the Bay is Thunder Point, rising
1 1 20 feet above the surface of the water, which has been
several times sounded without finding the bottom giving
to the Lake the same depth as at Pye Island. This Basalt
Point has a height of 3520 feet Great part of it is finely
fluted, and the edges of their concaves fine and sharp and
the waves of the Lake seem to have no effect on it, though
exposed to all their force, indeed the Basalt walls of both
places appear as fresh and firm as if Providence had placed
them there only a few years ago. From the west end of the
Lake by the north and east sides to the Falls of S' Maries are
thirty one Rivers, of which the S' Louis the Mishipacoton and
the Neepego, are about 150 yards in width the others from
thirty to sixty yards wide, and twenty eight Brooks. On the
south side there are forty Rivers two of these 150 yards in
width the others from twenty to seventy yards, and forty
one Brooks. All of these Rivers and Brooks are fed by the
Rain and snow, and by the evaporation from this great Lake
which rests upon the surrounding high Lands, and is not
wafted beyond them. From the heights of these lands all
the above Streams rush down in a series of Rapids and Falls,
with some intervals of moderate current, as they pass over a
table land. On the south side the River Ontonoggan the
native name has from old times been noted for the pieces
of pure copper found there, of which the Indians made their
weapons before the arrival of the French and afterwards
for the services of the Churches.
Learning from my Men that a short distance up the River
there was a large Mass of Copper, we left our canoe and proceeded
on foot to it we found it lying on a beach of limestone
at the foot of a high craig of the same it's shape round,
the upper part a low convex, all worn quite smooth by the
attrition of water and ice, but now lying dry. We tried to
cut a chip from it, but it was too tough for our small axe.
Note. This mass of pure copper has since been taken to
WashingtonAt the extremity of the great
Point called by the Natives Keewewoonanoo We return
now shortened to Keewenow, in a small harbour we took
pieces of copper ore. I named it Copperass harbour. Both
at this place, at the above River and a few other places I
learn the people of the United States for these three years
1848 have worked the Copper Mines with considerable
profit and have also found much silver.
It is not easy to conceive of the vast quantity of alluvial
of all kinds brought down by seventy one Rivers and sixty
nine Brooks rushing down these high lands, that surround
the Lake, the accumulation of centuries must be very great
yet such is the depth of the Lake, not a single River shows a
point of alluvial worth notice. Note. In the Province of
Auvergne in France, there appears to have been a Lake of
the size of Lake Superior, the barriers of which appear to have
been broken down by an earthquake, and the Lake emptied.
One aUuvial from a River destroyed at the same time, was
computed to be nine hundred feet in height from the bottom
of the Lake. This catastrophe must have happened previous
to the time of Julius Caser, for had it happened in his time,
or since, the Roman historians would have noticed such an
event. Saussave.
The northern part of North America is noted for it's
numerous and large Lakes far more than any other part of
the world. The Great Architect said Let them be, and
they were  but he has given to his creature the power
examine his works on our globe and perhaps learn the order
in which he has placed them. If we examine the positions
of all these Lakes, their greatest lengths will be found to be
about between North and thirty degrees west, and South
and thirty degrees east, which are the Hnes of direction of
the east side of the Great Plains, and of the Rocky Mountains:
the anomaHes to this order are Lakes Michigan, Superior and
Athabasca. The west sides of the Lakes are of Limestone
and the east sides of Granite. Between these two formations
are the great wide chasms, or valleys filled with water,
which are the Lakes. And the three above Lakes, although
lying west and east, have their south sides of Limestone and
their north sides of the granitic order, and their deep waters
in their same kind of valley. The few Lakes that lie as it
were within the east side of the Great Plains, as Cumberland
and the Cedar Lakes are wholly within the Limestone formation,
and are comparatively shoal water Lakes.
Having settled by observations the Latitude and Longitude
of the trading house of St Louis's River at the west end
of Lake Superior on the of May we proceeded to
survey the south side of the Lake. In the afternoon we came
to four Lodges of Chipaways. They had just arrived from the
interior, having wintered at the west end of the Porcupine
HiUs and now pass the summer on the borders of the Lake to
maintain themselves by fishing. They are about 28 families,
and by the usual rule of seven souls to a family their number
is 196 persons. My Men thought, for the number of Men,
there were more old Women than usual. Although the
interior rises high, yet near the Lake the shores are low,
with many fine sandy beaches, for setting of nets for fishing;
yet the Natives make no use of them, although they see the
success of the white men If a net is given to them, they are
too indolent to take care of it, and it soon becomes useless.
They prefer
woods seen from the Lake were of white and red Birch,
Spruce Pines, Larch and Aspins, all of small growth.
The next day we passed an Island of Sand Stone which
the Waves had worn into rude arches, with many caves. The
next day we came to three Lodges containing fifteen families,
being 105 souls. An American of the States was living with
them, and had adopted their way of life in preference to hard
labor on a farm. In the afternoon we passed Mons'' Michel
Cadotte  with five men and several Lodges of the natives from
their winter quarters, now to live by fishing.
The night and morning of the 15th May was a severe
frost. The Land all day very high and bold shores. Having
gone eleven miles we came to the Montreal River of 25 yards
in width, between banks of rock near the Lake is a Fall of
30 feet in height. The course of this River is through the
Porcupine Hills the lower parts of which are now the coasts
of the Lake Two of my Men had wintered near the head of
this River. As the whole length of the River is a series of
Falls between steep banks of rock the distance from the Lake
to the House was one continued Carrying Place of 130 rests.
A Rest, or Pose, is the distance the cargo of the canoe is
carried from place to place and then rest. In this hilly country
a Rest may be from five to six hundred yards, and the
130 rests about forty miles. The men say the distance takes
them thirty seven days of carrying to the House. All the
trading Houses on the south side of the Lake require many
miles of carrying, with some intervals of current to take the
cargo of the canoe to the wintering ground. The Men who
winter and have to traverse the country in every direction,
say the Lakes are few and small, more like beaver ponds than
Lakes and that in very many places sandstone for
knives and axes are to be found. We came to a lodge of five
families, they had seen no person for eight Moons, and had
all their winters hunt with them, of about 360 pounds of
furrs. Further on was a lodge of ten families.
Early on the 17th May we came to the Fair River at the
east end of the Porcupine Hills. The interior country has
now lower land. The Woods hitherto have much white
Cedar, with Birch, Aspin and Pine, with a few Maple  and
Plane Trees, all of very common growth. An extensive body
of ice lying before us, we had to put ashore and pass the
day. We set a net but caught only six Carp. The wind
having drifted the ice from the shore, early on the 18th we
set oif and soon came to the Ontonoggan River, where lay
the great mass of Copper I have already mentioned. Here
was a Mr Cadotte with four Lodges of Indians, he informed
us that last summer 1797 a party of Americans had visited
the River and proceeded twenty miles up it to the Forks of
the River, they had promised the Indians to come this
summer 1798 and build a Fort and work the mines, for which
the Chippaways were waiting for them, but this promise
they did not perform until the year 1845. Mr Cadotte had
a few goods remaining and requested a passage with us for
himself and goods which we gave him and he embarked
with us.
Full twenty five miles North eastward of the Ontonoggan
River are high steep rocks of a reddish color, which have the
most distant Echo I have ever heard. We stopped a short
time to amuse ourselves with it The Rocks were about
200 feet in
One of the Men, Francois Babue, who had been many years
in the furr trade of the Lake used to abuse the Echo until
he worked himself into a violent passion did the same this
time until his expressions becoming too coarse, we moved off,
he swearing, that he thought it very hard he never could
have the last word. The greater part of this day we were in
much danger from the Ice, which lay in the Lake a short
distance from the shore had it come in we could not have
saved ourselves as the rocks were high and steep. At pm
we put up on Keewenaw Carrying Place This is a remarkable
place, being an Isthmus of 2000 yards, in a south course
and forms a body of Land in circuit 94 Miles into a Peninsula:
known under the name of Point Keewenaw. The bank is
about twenty feet in height; the first 1100 yards is good
ground the other 960 yards a perfect swamp. To avoid
going round this Peninsula of high land the people of the
States in time to come will cut a Canal through the Isthmus,
at a small expence, as a Lock is not required. The night
being clear, as usual, I observed for Latitude and Longitude
the former 47.14.27 N. Longitude 88 38' 36 West.
From the Carrying Place is a Brook of 1-5 mile to a
small Lake, and then a kind of Lagoon of 24 miles to Lake
Superior. Part of the Lagoon, on one side the Woods
were on fire, the heat and smoke made us lay by for a few
hours. On the 22nd and 24th of May we had heavy rain
with vivid Lightning and loud Thunder. The provisions we
had to live on were hulled Corn, part of a bag of wild rice,
with a few pounds of grease to assist the boihng. It is
customary after supper, to boil corn or rice for the meals of
next day, and in good weather we set off by 4 am, the Kettles
were taken off the fire in a boiling state and
sour and had to be thrown away but the rice never soured:
the same thing in the night, when the kettle had corn it was
soured, but if of rice it kept good the Men assured me that
the Lightning and Thunder had no effect on the wild rice;
and that in the heats of Summer the Corn soured so frequently,
they were half starved to boil a Kettle of corn
requires three to four hours. The rice is cooked in half an
hour, but it is very weak food. All the Corn for these voyages
has to be steeped in hot lye of wood ashes to take off the rind
of the grain. On the May we arrived. Thank God at
the Falls of S Maries, the discharge of Lake Superior, and
the head of the River S Lawrence, which flows into Lake
Huron.
Here I had the pleasure of meeting Sir Alexander
M'Kenzie the celebrated traveller who was the first to follow
down the great stream of water flowing northward from the
Slave Lake into the Arctic Sea, and which great River bears his
name, and was made well known to the public by the journey
of Sir John Franklin. Upon my report to him of the surveys
I had made and the number of astronomical Observations foi
Latitude, Longitude and Variation of the Compass, he was
pleased to say I had performed more in ten months than he
expected could be done in two years. The next day the
Honorable William McGilHvray arrived. These gentlemen
were the Agents, and principal Partners of the North West
Company they requested me to continue the survey of the
Lake round the east and north sides to the Grand Portage,
then the Depot of the company. The survey we had finished
was of the south side, from the west, to the east end following
the shores, the distance is 671 miles, but the direct line
is only 383 miles. We had met with no families, and
allowing twenty families not seen, will give 130 families.
Mr Cadotte, who has been for many years a Trader in these
parts, thought 125 families to be nearer the number. Allowing
these Nati
the distance of 70 miles from the Lake, the extent will be
26,810 square miles, and this divided by 130 will give to each
family an extent of 206 square miles of hunting ground yet
with this wide area the annual average hunt of each family
of all kinds of furrs, from the Bear down to the Musk Rat,
will not exceed sixty to seventy skins in trade allowing a
Bear skin to be the value of two beavers and eight to ten
musk Rats to be the value of one beaver. Deer are so scarce
that all they kill does not furnish leather for their wants, and
when the mild seasons come they all descend to Lake Superior
to live by fishing. Calculation is tedious reading, yet without
it, we cannot learn the real state of any country. Note.
Mr Ballantyne of the Hudson's Bay Company has lately
published a work, with the title of Six years residence in
Hudson's Bay, in which, speaking of the Bay, he says the
interior has Myriads of wild animals. The Natives will
thank him to show them where they are. When he wrote
those words he must have been thinking of Musketoes, and
in this respect he was right.
The Forests of the Lake are such as has been already
described I could not learn that any of the Forest Trees
acquired a growth to merit particular notice, except the
white Birch, the Rind of which is very good for canoes, and
of a large size.
On the first day of June we left the Falls of St Maries and
from thence surveyed the east and part of the north shores
of Lake Superior to the y day of this month, when late we
arrived at the Grand Portage, then the Depot of the North
West Company, to which the furrs of the interiour country
came, and from whence the merchandise was taken for the
furr trade to about the same time the following year, as
already described. The Falls of St Maries is a rapid of about
three fourths of a mile in length in which it descends
feet and then by three channels of easy current descends to
Lake Huron. The carrying place is about a mile in length
of low wet ground, very easy for a canal and locks, and which
at length is about to be completed in this year of i848
The opposite bank of these rapids belong to the United
States, it is steep and above twenty feet in height, and a
canal could not be made but at enormous expence. While waiting
for the Province of Canada to make a canal on the only
side in which it can be made, these enterprising people made
a deep channel at the foot of their steep bank with a tow path
for their Vessels, but the strength of the current makes the
passage somewhat dangerous. This canal they will now do
away with. The mines of copper ore that have been worked
both by the citizens of the United States and the people of
this province now demand a canal which otherwise would
not have been made, although the fisheries of Lake Superior
required a canal many years ago, but as yet, only the people
of the States
the Pacific Ocean. The River before us was] wholly
unknown to us, and all information only a day's journey of
Rapids direct before us by Observations I found the Latitude
of these, the Ilthkoyape Falls to be 48. 38'. 7 N
Longitude 117. 48'. 49 west, and the Variation 20 degrees
East rhe names of my men were Michel Bourdeaux, Pierre
Pareil, Joseph Cote, Michel Boulard, Francois Gregoire;
with Charles and Ignace, two good Iroquois Indians, and two
Simpoil natives for Interpreters. We placed the Horses in
care of the Chief of the Village.
After praying the Almighty to protect and prosper us on 
our voyage to the Ocean, early on the third of July we embarked
and descended the River for near seventy miles, and
in the evening came to the Village of the Simpoil Indians.
In the above distance we had several strong Rapids which
required all our skill and activity, at one of which we had to
carry everything for near three fourths of a mile, the water
is high in the River, the current very strong with many
small whirlpools and eddies, but not dangerous. At fifty six
miles we passed the junction of the Spokane River, which
comes from the southeastward by a long series of unnavigable
Falls; the whole of this day the country has a pleasing
appearance, in places thinly wooded, but the greater part
meadows of short grass, very fine for sheep. The grounds
high and dry; above and below the Spokane River the banks
were often of perpendicular Rock of trap and basalt of a
black gray color, in places reddish, these banks had a curious
appearance to the height of about three hundred and fifty
feet, they retired from the River by a perpendicular step of
twenty to thirty feet, then a level table of ten to twenty
feet, from which rose another steep step, and level table to
the top of the bank. The width of the River may be estimated
at about
for the Chiefs of the Village to come and smoke, they
came, and the Men followed in single file, and all sat down
round the tent; the Chief made a short speech, saying he
was glad to see us, and then made a present of two half dried
Salmon, and about half a bushel of Roots of two kinds, the
one called Kamass a white root, of a slight bitter taste which
becomes a favorite, and is agreeable to the stomach; the
other is a kind of small onion, which is dug out of the ground
near the surface in a soft rich soil of loam, then washed and
baked in a smothered heat, when from white, they become a
rich dark brown and very sweet, they are nourishing, but
eaten too freely with moss bread, are apt to loosen the bowels,
and these two served for the rough bread and cheese of the
country. I have already remarked that this bread is made
from the long black moss, like hair that grows on the red
Fir Trees. Four pipes were now lighted and the smoking
enjoyed as a feast. The Chief made a long speech in a loud
singing voice, and each sentence responded to by the
others by Oy Oy the Speech being ended and interpreted
to us, was thanks for our arrival, and hoping we would bring
to them Guns, Ammunition, Axes, Knives, Awls, and not to
forget Steels and Flints with many other articles, they were
able and willing to hunt, and would be able to pay for everything
they wanted, but at present they had only their hands
to procure food and clothing, and much more to the same
purpose, all too true. I then explained to them my object
to know how this River was to the sea, and if good, very
large Canoes with Goods of all kinds would arrive, by which
they would be supplied with Clothing and all they wanted
if they were industrious hunters. The two Simpoil Indians
collected; at the end of every three, or four, sentences, they
stopped and the Chief repeated the same aloud, so that all
could hear, and he was answered by Oy Oy. We noticed
that the News, whether good or bad, was pronounced in the
same tone of voice. Smoking for the present being over,
permission was asked for the Women to come and see us,
which being accorded they soon came with their children,
and made us a present of Roots and Berries; and sat down
around the Aien. Smoking commenced for a short time,
each Man took three hearty whiffs at the calumets passed,
but the Women were allowed only one whiff which they made
a long whiff.
The Chief now proposed they should all dance, to this
we assented; the Men formed two slightly curved lines with
the women close behind them; they had no instruments
and the only music was the song of a man painted Red and
Black, his hair stuck full of Feathers. His voice was strong
and good, but had few notes; during the song which lasted
about eight minutes, the dancers moved very slowly forward
with an easy motion, and without changing their position
danced back to the place they had left. At the end of the
song each person sat down in the place where the song left
them the Chief made a speech of about two minutes; the
Song commenced and the dance, and in this manner continued
for about an hour when they ended and they retired to their
Lodges, and left us to our repose, which we much wanted:
The next day to acquire a knowledge of the country, I
remained until near Noon; the information was, the country
around them was much the same as that we had passed, to
the foot of the Hills; whither all the Deer had gone for
green grass and
be able to supply their wants; for at present two thirds of
their food is roots and berries, the few Salmon they get is
from a Wier across a Brook of fifteen yards wide, they are
small and poor, they did not know the use of the Net or
Seine. Of their Religion I had no time to learn much. They
seemed to acknowledge a Great Spirit who dwelled in the
clouds to be the master of everything, and when they died
their Souls went to him; the Sun, Moon and Stars were all
divinities, but the Sun above all; and that he made the
Lightning, Thunder and Rain. Their worship was in dancing,
and the last dance they gave me was for a safe voyage and
return to them.
At noon we left this poor but friendly people, and proceeded
down the River for six hours, the first four hours the
country was bold high grassy hills, which at length came on
the River in steep banks, with isolated rocks, and steep cliffs
all having a ruinous appearance, the ravines were many, steep,
narrow and rocky, the descent of the Rains had not left a
grain of earth, these cliffs contracted the width of the River,
the waves ran high with many whirlpools and eddies, in
one place the Steersman who was standing to guide the
Canoe lost his balance and fell out of the Canoe, but we
recovered him, we carried along part of a dangerous rapid
;
at 6 PM we tried to find a place to pitch our cotton tents, but
after an hour's search, we had to sit on the rocks and leave the
Canoe in the water. To stem this current is impossible,
and although the River is very high, yet some three years
past, by the Trees lodged among the Rocks, the water must
have been twelve
two for present use; and then embarked, in a short distance
we came to a heavy Rapid, the high waves of which obliged
us to put ashore, and carry everything full two miles; while
we were doing this a Chief with about sixty men, their women
and Children came to, and helped, us over the Carrying
Place. This being done, the Chief for himself and his people
made a present of five Horses, five good Salmon well roasted,
a bushel of arrow wood berries which are sweet, wholesome
and nourishing; about two bushels of various roots, some of
which I had not seen before, and the dried meat of four
small, very fat, animals, which I took to be Marmots;
 the
two latter with the five Horses I requested the Chief to take
in charge until we returned; for what we kept I paid three
feet of tobacco; fourteen plain and stone rings, eighteen
hawks bells, six feet of a string of blue beads, nine feet of
gartering, four papers of vermillion, four awls and six buttons,
which they thankfully accepted; such is the barter of these
countries with the Natives; heavy rain obliged us to pass
the day here.
This tribe is called Inspaelis, as they procure the Salmon
from the River, and not from a Weir on a Brook, the Salmon
are larger and in good condition, and from their clothing the
Deer are more plentifull than with the Simpoils, they are a
finer people, several of the Men were six feet in height; the
face rather oval, the eyes black, the nose straight and
prominent, the cheek bones moderate, teeth and mouth good,
the chin round, on the whole their appearance is manly,
mild, open and friendly. The men were ornamented with a
few shells, the women more profusely, in their ears, round
the neck, and hanging to their girdles; the tint of the skin
was not so dark as that of a Spaniard, some of the Women
daubed their faces with red ochre. Their Language
by whom I learned they have sufficient Deer in winter for
their support and clothing if they were better armed; they
have good blankets made of Bear, of Musk Rat, or the black
tailed Antelope, which are cut into narrow stripes, and neatly
interwoven. Each blanket was of one of these animals, and
not mixed.
They described their country as high, dry and hilly, with
short grass, the rock showing itself in many places, with but
few trees, and those of Fir, stunted and scattered; such a
country appears fit for only sheep, deer, and horses; but has
many Brooks of clear water their manner of hunting is the
same as alredy described.
After smoking some time, they prepared to give us a
Dance, that we might have a safe voyage to the sea and in
like manner return to them. The Chief made a short prayer,
after which the dance commenced of the Men and Women,
each separate, to the music of their singing, which was pleasingly
plaintive, their voices full and clear and not too loud;
each line of Men and Women had a clear space of three or
four feet, within which they danced; at first the step was
slow, and the singing the same, but both gradually increased,
the step of the dance very quick as if pursuing, or being
pursued. This lasted for about eight minutes, when a pause
of two minutes took place; a prayer was made, and the dance
and singing repeated twice the whole was strictly a religious
ceremony, every face was grave and serious, almost to
sadness; the prayers of the Chief was accompanied with
holding up his hands to heaven, and so far as I have seen the
people on the west side of the Mountains, their Religion
appears simple an
Redeemer of Mankind. They went to their Lodges, and sent
us a Salmon for which I paid six inches of tobacco. The
rapid of this carrying place is in several ridges, rushing down
a descent of full thirty feet; and the Salmon ascended to
these.
July 6th. A rainy morning; early several Men with a few
Women came and smoked a while, the Women had bracelets
of Shells and fillets of the same round the head. At 6i am
we embarked and in less than four hours came to a Tribe
and Village called Smeathhowe; as usual we put ashore, and
I sent the Simpoils to invite them to come and smoke with
us. They found them consulting what they should make a
present of, for the stranger must have a present made to
him or them. My reason for putting ashore and smoking
with the Natives, is to make friends with them, against my
return, for in descending the current of a large River, we
might pass on without much attention to them; but in
returning against the current, our progress will be slow and
close along the shore, and consequently very much in their
power; whereas staying a few hours, and smoking with them,
while explaining to them the object of my voyage makes
them friendly to us. The Men, Women and Children now
came dancing, and singing a mild, plaintive
Children to sit near the Men; the pipes were lighted,
and they all smoked with avidity the men taking from three
to six whiffs, some swallowing the smoke, but the Women
were allowed only one whiff. They now gave us three well
roasted Salmon, and half a bushel of Arrow Wood Berries,

very acceptable to us, for which I paid them. I learned
that from the time of the arrival of the Salmon, all the fish
that are taken for a certain time must be roasted, not boiled;
the Chiefs then assemble, and after some ceremonies, the
Salmon are allowed to be boiled, or cooked for the rest of
the season, as the people choose. The appearance of this
tribe is the same as the last, except the Women being more
profusely ornated with shells their knowledge of the River
extended no farther than to the next village, where we would
learn the state of the River beyond them. At Noon we left
them and soon came to a bold Rapid of two miles in length,
the waves being too high for our Canoe we had to carry,
the Chief and four young men came with horses and helped
us to the foot of the Rapid for which I gave them eight inches
of Tobacco, which was thankfully accepted; this carrying
place took us to zi pm. We then descended a strong current
for full three and a half hours, and camped on the left for
the first time, the right being steep rocks. 2 The country and
banks of the river high, bold hills, very rude; with steep
cliffs; we could have passed hours in viewing the wild scenery,
but these romantic
Mountain Sheep looking down on us, which we longed to
eat, but he] could not be approached. We had to kill two
Rattle Snakes that would not get out of our way.
July 7th. Having descended ten miles, we saw several
Men on horseback proceeding to the westward, two of them
rode to the River side, we went to, and smoked with them,
and each of us held on our ways. I learned that they were
sent from a Village to apprise them of our coming. Having
continued for four miles, we came to two long Lodges of the
same structure as those we have passed, sufficiently well
covered with rush matts; one of these Lodges was two
hundred and forty feet in length; the other sixty feet in
length; each by thirty feet in breadth; all these measurements
are by stepping the lengths at three feet each step.
By their account the name of this tribe is Sinkowarsin;
 they
are about one hundred and twenty families, and from the
Women and Children must be about eight hundred Souls:
the Language is still a dialect of the Saleesh, but my Simpoil
Interpreters find several words they did not understand;
when we passed, and put ashore below them, they were all
dancing in their Lodges, to the sound of their songs, for
hitherto we have not seen a musical instrument even of the
most rude kind along this River. We sent to them to come
and smoke, five steady looking men came, sat down near us
and smoked, but although many of the Natives we had
passed viewed us with some suspicion, as at a loss what to
make of us, these Men much more so, nor could their countenances
features, the children well formed and playful, and respect
with kind attention to each other pervaded the whole; tho'
at present poor in provisions, they were all in good health,
and except the infirmities of old age, we have not seen a
sick person, partly from using much vegetable food, and
partly from a fine dry temperate climate.
They describe their country to the southward to be being
high dry and barren, without animals; to the northward the
lands are good with Antelopes, Mountain Sheep Big Horn 
and Goats, 2 of which their clothing is made, and of the fine
long wool of the latter they make good rude blankets. They
had also a few Bison Robes which they must have traded
from other Tribes; all these things allowed them to be
better clothed than any tribe we had yet seen. We saw no
weapons of war with them, and like all the other Tribes
they may be said to be unarmed and like them also they
were all as cleanly as people can be without the use of Soap,
an article not half so much valued in civilized life as it ought
to be. What would become of the Belle and the Beau without
it. And also all linen, and cotton; I have often known
the want of it, and had to use fine blue clay as a substitute.
As we were about to leave this people with their prayers
for our safety, a fine looking man came to us and requested
a passage in our Canoe for himself and Wife, to a tribe below
us of which he was a Chief. He remarked to us that the
Simpoil Indians could not interpret for us much farther down
the River, as the Natives spoke a different language, which
both himself and his Wife well understood, and that he
would then become our Interpreter, glad of the offer we gave
them a passage with their little baggage. After descending
people to whom we are utterly unknown, a trifling accident
might produce serious effects. Here was a place for a winter
campment, it was of the form of a long Lodge, the earth a
dry light soil excavated to the depth of one foot, clean and
level, the floor of earth, over which the Lodge is erected.
Having descended the current for twenty one miles we
camped for the night. To this distance the Banks of the
River have become much lower, but all the bays opposite
the Points of the River have steep banks of trap rock, about
forty to fifty feet, the points are of fine meadow, and when
the water subsides to it's usual level must be extensive the
current more moderate, yet has many whirlpools. On the
whole this day the River and country has a more pleasing
appearance than usual, but without woods, except a few
scattered dwarf red Fir.
July 8th. Having proceeded seven miles we came to a
village of Sixty Two families, the rapid current drove us half
a mile below the village before we could land; the Chief, a
middle aged, manly looking man on Horseback now rode
down to examine us, he appeared very much agitated, the
foam coming out of his mouth; wheeling his horse backwards
and forwards, and calling aloud, who are you, what
are you. Our custom was to leave one, or two, men in the
Canoe to keep it afloat, the rest of us drew up near the shore,
about three feet from each other all well armed, myself in
the front apparently unarmed; this Chief sometimes appeared
to make a dash
composed, my native interpreter, who stood with us now
spoke to him in a manly manner telHng him who we were,
and what we came for, to which he listened with attention,
then called out oy, oy. He was now joined by a well made,
short, stout old man, his hair quite white, he was on foot
and came with a message. We invited him to come with his
people and smoke, upon which he set off on a gallop, the old
man on foot keeping near him. Having repeated to the people
what we had said and to come forward and smoke, he returned
at the same pace, the old man keeping close to him.
To our admiration, he was naked and barefooted, and we could
not help saying to each other, which of us at his age will be
equally active. The Man came and smoking commenced, a
present of four Salmon, and two of a small species, with
berries were made, of the latter we took only part. By the
interpreter I told them what I had to say, the Chief repeated
the words in a loud voice, which was repeated by a man in
a louder voice. The women now came forwards, singing
and dancing which they continued all the time the men were
smoking The Men were well formed, but not handsome,
tho' their features were regular, they were poorly clothed;
and the women equally so, two of them were naked, but not
abashed; they all had shells in their nostrils some had fillets
round the head and bracelets of shells round the wrists, or
arms, but want of clothing made them appear to disadvantage.
These people are altogether distinct from those we
have seen, and are of the Shawpatin, or as it is sometimes
pronounced, Sararpatin nation, of which there are several
tribes, and speak a Language peculiar to themselves, it
appeared soft, with many vowels, and easy of pronunciation
;
it is the native tongue of the Interpreter. These people, as
well as those of the last Village, are making use of the Seine
Net, which is well made from wild Hemp, which grows on
the rich low grounds. The net appeared about full
trimmed and worked in the manner we use it, which gave
them a supply for the day, and a few to dry. But fish
however plenty can never compensate the want of Deer,
Sheep, and Goats for clothing, and frequently a change of
food.
We left these people and proceeded forty miles to 5 pm
when seeing a large camp before us we put ashore; four
Horsemen came to us, and having smoked I told them to
invite the Men to come and smoke, they came and sat down
in an orderly manner, the pipes went round, and the often
repeated speech was made of my going to the Sea, to procure
all the Articles they were so much in want of, and return to
them, and for which they must be industrious hunters in the
winter season, and procure furrs for payment; all this was
readily promised, they said somewhere near their campment
would be a good place for us to make a Lodge and trade
with them, as the large River close below them led to a fine
country and skirted the distant Mountains we saw; that they
had a very mild winter, the depth of Snow they showed was
about eight inches, they had sometimes more but it] soon
melted away. They represented to us, that they had plenty
of Deer, two of the species very small, with small Trout and
other Fish for the winter, with dried Salmon; all the above
in long detail was repeated by three Chiefs, after each other,
in a loud voice they made us a present of four Salmon, for
the first time fat,
boiled, they had neither roots nor berries; while the Salmon
season continues they live wholly by the Seine Net.
The name of this Tribe is Skaemena, they are Shawpatins,
and number one hundred and fifty families, and are not less
than about one thousand souls. They were all tolerably well
dressed, many of the women had not a shell in their nostril;
and less ornamented than those we have seen. They were
healthy, and as clean as people can be without Soap. The Men
were generally above the middle size, rather tall, well made
for activity, their features good, mild yet manly; many of the
women would pass for handsome if better dressed, they were
decent, modest and well behaved. And both sexes kind and
attentive to each other, and to their children, most of the
latter were poorly clothed, or naked. After giving a dance
for a safe voyage, at 9 pm
Provisions to keep us until we should come to where
the Bisons are; after which we lived by hunting them to
the upper end of the Plains; to where the River passes
through Forests to the Mountains. Here engaged two native
men to hunt for us, the Red Deer and Bisons of the Woods.
The manner of furnishing the Men with Provisions, was by
hunting these animals, and bringing their meat by Horses t
the Canoes a supply for full three days; when we appointed
a place to meet them with a fresh supply; thus the Canoes
proceeded to within twenty miles of the east foot of the
Mountains; we had given them a full supply for three days,
and M WilHam Henry, the two Indians and myself proceeded
to the foot of the Mountains, where we killed three Red
Deer, made a Stage and placed the meat on it in safety to
wait the Canoes. This was on the 13th October 18 10, and we
expected the Canoes to arrive late on the 16th or early on
the 1
7 at latest, but they did not make their appearance;
our oldest Hunter of about forty years of age as usual rose
very early in the morning and looking at the Stage of Meat,
said to me, I have had bad dreams, this meat will never be
eaten, he then saddled his Horse and rode off. Somewhat
alarmed at his ominous expression and the non arrival of the
canoes, I told Mr Henry and the Indian to proceed thro' the
Woods down along the River in search of the Canoes, and
see what detained them, with positive orders not to fire a
shot but in
seen a camp of Peeagans on the bank of the River, that a
short distance below the camp, they had descended the bank
to the River side, and found where the Canoes had been.
They had made a low rampart of Stones to defend themselves,
and there was blood on the stones; they went below this
and fired a shot in hopes of an answer from the Canoes, but
it was not returned: I told them they had acted very
foolishly, that the Peeagans would be on us very early in the
morning, and that we must start at the dawn of day, and
ride for our Hves; on this we acted the next morning, and
rode off, leaving the meat: the country we had to pass over
was an open forest, but we had to cross, or ride round so
many fallen trees that active Men on foot could easily keep
up with us; the Peeagans had very early arrived at the Stage
of meat and directly followed the tracks of the Horses, and
would in the evening have come up with us, but providentially
about one in afternoon snow came on which covered our
tracks and retarded them; about an hour after, as they
related, they came on three grizled Bears direct on the track
they were smelling the tracks of the Horses they were fully
perswaded that I had placed the Bears there to prevent any
further pursuit; nor could any arguments to the contrary
make them believe otherwise and this behef was a mercy to
us: we rode on through the Woods until it was nearly dark,
when we were obliged to stop; we remained quiet awaiting
our fortune, when finding all quiet, we made a small fire,
and passed the night with some anxiety; my situation precluded
sleep, cut off from my men, uncertain where to find
them, and equally so of the movements of the Indians, I was
at a loss what to do, or which way to proceed; morning came
and I had to determine what course to take, after being
much perplexed whether I should take to the defiles of the
Mountains and see if the Men and Horses were s
second day we found them about forty miles below the
Indians, at a trading Post lately deserted; here after much
consultations, we fully perceived we had no further hopes of
passing in safety by the defiles of the Saskatchewan River,
and that we must now change our route to the defiles of the
Athabasca River which would place us in safety, but would
be attended with great inconvenience, fatigue, suffering and
privation; but there was no alternative. We therefore
directed the Men to proceed through the woods to the
defiles of the Mountains and bring down the Horses to take
the Goods across the country to the Athabasca River, and on
the October they arrived with twenty four Horses and
we were now in all twenty four Men; having furnished
ourselves with leather Tents and dressed leather for shoes
;
we loaded our Horses in proportion to their strength from
180 to 240 pounds weight each Horse, and arranged the Men,
four to hunt and procure provisions, two Men to clear a path
thro' the woods, the other taking care of the Horses, and other
duties; with Thomas an Iroquois Indian as Guide; our
road lay over the high grounds within about thirty miles of
the Mountains; the Woods are mostly of a kind of Cypress,
of small clean growth, and not close. With occasional cutting
away of few trees we should have made several miles a day,
but the forests are so frequently burned and occasions so
many windfalls, that the Horses make very slow progress,
thus the dense forests are destroyed and meadows formed.
We went eight miles in six and a half hours, and put up,
without any supper. The country tolerable good with Pine
and Aspin Woods.
October 30th. The hunters, thank heaven, killed two
cow Bisons and a young grizled Bear. We went six miles and
camped, as we had to collect the meat, the ground was wet,
the Horses fatig
with two men passed the day examining the country which
they found passable, but no success in hunting.
November 2nd. A fine warm day. Having for near three
hours cleared a path through the woods, we went ten miles,
in this distance we crossed the Pembinaw River of forty yards
in width, but shoal; this name is a corruption of Neepinmenan
Summer Berry. Observed for Latitude and Longitude.
The Horses in going thro' the wood often deranged
their loads, and as they came; the wet ground of to-day,
with burnt fallen wood fatigued the Horses, and we camped
early. And thus we continued with the usual occurrences
and mishaps to the 29th of November, when we came on the
Athabasca River; up which we ascended till the afternoon
of the 4th of December; here our Guide told me it was of
no use at this late season to think of going any further with
Horses, and part were sent to the Mountain House, but from
this place prepare ourselves with Snow Shoes and Sleds to
cross the Mountains: Accordingly the next day we began
to make Log Huts to secure the Goods, and Provisions, and
shelter ourselves from the cold and bad weather; the Thermometer
on our march had descended to -32 which is
64 degrees below the freezing point, and by means of this
intense cold, the marshes and morasses were frozen over
Our whole attention for the present was turned to hunting
and securing provisions; having now made Snow Shoes, and
Sleds, on the 30th day of December we commenced our
journey to cross the Mountains and proceeded up the Athabasca
River, sometimes on it's shoals and ice, and at times
through the woods of it's banks. The soil was sandy and a
Gale of Wind drifted it to lie on the low branched pines, of
wretched growth, for Snow does not lie on Sand Hills; On
the 31' December we proceeded but slowly and I had to
reduce the weight of the Loads of the Dogs to less than two
thirds, and make a Log Hoard to secure what we left. This,
the work of two hours the men took five hours to finish,
during which time they cooked twice a four gallon Kettle
full of Meat, which they devoured, although they had had a
hearty breakfast, in fact a french Canadian has the appetite
of a Wolf, and glories in it; each man requires eight pounds
of meat p day, or more; upon my reproaching some of them
with their gluttony, the reply I got was, What pleasure
have we in Life but eating. A French Canadian if left to
himself, and living on what his Master has, will rise very early
make a hearty meal, smoke his pipe, and lie down to sleep,
and he will do Httle else through the day: to enumerate
the large animals that had been killed, and I may say devoured
by my men
the same Men when with me on government
surveys, where the allowance was one pound of mess Pork
the best one and a half pound of good fresh Biscuit and
half a pound of pease, did not find it too much, and the
evening of each day left nothing. Thus ended the year.
1811. January 1st. The Thermometer -22. Our Hunters
were fortunate in killing two young Bulls, and a Mountain
Sheep; we marched all day to 4 pm when we camped,
placing the branches of the Pine under us, and a few small
branchy Trees to windward, this was all our protection from
the bitter cold,
January 2nd. Ther - 20. Collected the meat of the hunt
of yesterday, and staid all day roughly spHtting and drying
what we could to take with us, as of meat in this state,
the weight is much lessened but not the nourishment. I now
lessened the Dog Sleds to eight, the men had beaten two of
them to be useless; a Canadian never seems to be better
pleased than, when swearing at, and flogging his Dogs. It
is quite his amusement, careless of consequences.
Jany 3rd. Arrangements for the journey.
Jany 4th. As usual the Men early up cooking a plentiful
breakfast, they are stimulated to this by the sight of the
snowy Mountains before us, and are determined to put themselves
in a good condition for fasting, with which the passage
of the Mountains threaten them.
Jany 5th. Thermometer - 26 very cold. Having secured
the goods and provisions we could not take with us, by 11 am
set off with eight Sleds, to each two dogs, with goods and
Provisions to cross the Mountains, and three Horses to assist
us as far as the depth of the Snow will permit. We
River, the woods of Pine are stunted, full of branches to the
ground, and the Aspin, Willow c not much better: strange
to say, here is a strong belief that the haunt of the Mammoth,
is about this defile, I questioned several, none could positively
say, they had seen him, but their belief I found firm and not
to be shaken. I remarked to them, that such an enormous
heavy Animal must leave indelible marks of his feet, and his
feeding. This they all acknowledged, and that they had never
seen any marks of him, and therefore could show me none.
All I could say did not shake their behef in his existence.
January 6. We came to the last grass for the Horses
in Marshes and along small Ponds, where a herd of Bisons
had lately been feeding; and here we left the Horses poor
and tired, and notwithstanding the bitter cold, they] lived
through the winter, yet they have only a clothing of close
hair, short and without any furr.
January y. Continuing our journey in the afternoon we
came on the track of a large animal, the snow about six inches
deep on the ice; I measured it; four large toes each of four
inches in length to each a short claw; the ball of the foot
sunk three inches lower than the toes, the hinder part of the
foot did not mark well, the length fourteen inches, by eight
inches in breadth, walking from north to south, and having
passed about six hours. We were in no humour to follow him:
the Men and Indians would have it to be a young mammoth
and I held it to be the track of a large old grizled Bear; yet
the shortness of the nails, the ball of the foot, and it's great
size was not that of a Bear, otherwise that of a very large old
Bear, his claws worn away; this the Indians would not allow.
Saw several tracks of Moose Deer. 9 pm Ther - 4.
January. A fine day. We are now following the
Brooks in the open defiles of the secondary Mountains; when
we can no longer follow it, the road is to cross a point of high
land, very
2 to 3000 feet above their base, with patches of dwarf pines,
and much snow; we marched ten miles today; and as we
advance we feel the mild weather from the Pacific Ocean.
This morning at 7 am Ther +6 at 9 pm +22. One of my
men named Du Nord beat a dog to death, he is what we
call a flash man, a showy fellow before the women but
a coward in heart, and would willingly desert if he had courage
to go alone; very glutinous and requires full ten pounds of
meat each day. And as I am constantly ahead cannot
prevent his dog flogging and beating: We saw no tracks of
Animals.
January 9th. Ther +32. SE wind and snowed all day
which made hauling very bad. We could proceed only about
four miles, this partly up a brook and then over a steep high
point with dwarf pines. We had to take only half a load and
return for the rest. The snow is full seven feet deep, tho'
firm and wet, yet the Dogs often sunk in it, but our snow
shoes did not sink more than three inches; and the weather
so mild that the snow is dropping from the trees, and everything
wet; here the Men finished the last of the fresh and
half dried Meat, which I find to be eight pounds for each
man p day. Ther +22.
January; Ther +16. A day of Snow and southerly
Gale of wind, the afternoon fine, the view now before us was
an ascent of deep snow, in all appearance to the height of
land between the Atlantic and Pacific Oceans, it was to me
a most exhilarating sight, but to my uneducated men a
dreadful sight, they had no scientific object in view, their
feelings were of the place they were; our guide Thomas
told us, that although we could barely find wood to make a
fire, we must now provide wood to pass the following night
on the height of the defile we were in, and which we had
to follow; my men were the most hardy that could be picked
out of a hundred brave hardy Men, but the scene of desolation
before us was dreadful, and I knew it, a heavy gale of wind
much more a mountain storm would have buried us beneath
it, but thank God the weather was fine, we had to cut wood
such as it was, and each took a Httle on his sled, yet such
was the despondency of the Men, aided by the coward Du
Nord, sitting down at every half mile, that when night came,
we had only wood to make a bottom, and on this to lay
wherewith to make a small fire, which soon burnt out and in
this exposed situation we passed the rest of a long night
without fire, and part of my men had strong feelings of personal
insecurity, on our right about one third of a mile from
us lay an enormous Glacier, the eastern face of which quite
steep, of about two thousand feet in height, was of a clean
fine green color, which I much admired but whatever was
the appearance, my opinion was, that the whole was not
solid ice, but formed on rocks from rills of water frozen in
their course; westward of this steep face, we could see the
glacier with it's fine green color and it's patches of snow in
a gentle slope for about two miles; eastward of this glacier
and near to us, was a high steep wall of rock, at the foot of
this, with a fine south exposure had grown a Httle Forest of
Pines of about five hundred yards in length by one hundred
in breadth, by some avalanche they had all been cut clean off
as with a scythe, not one of these trees appeared an inch
higher than the others. My men were not at their ease, yet
when night came they admired the briUiancy of the Stars,
and as one of them said, he thought he could almost touch
them with his hand: as usual, when the fire was made I set
off to examine the country before us, and found we had now
to descend the west side of the Mountains; I returned and
found part of my Men with a Pole of twenty feet in length
boring the Snow to find the bottom; I told them while we
had good Snow Shoes it was no matter to us whether the
Snow was ten or one hundred feet deep. On looking into the
hole they hit descended the color became more deep, and at the
lowest point was of a blue, almost black. The altitude of
this place above the level of the Ocean, by the point of boiling
water is computed to be eleven thousand feet Sir George
Simpson. Many reflections came on my mind; a new world
was in a manner before me, and my object was to be at the
Pacific Ocean before the month of August, how were we to
find Provisions, and how many Men would remain with me,
for they were dispirited, amidst various thoughts I fell asleep
on my bed of Snow.
Early next morning we began our descent, here we soon
found ourselves not only with a change of climate, but more
so of Forest Trees, we had not gone half a mile before we
came to fine tall clean grown Pines of eighteen feet girth.
The descent was so steep that the Dogs could not guide the
Sleds, and often came across the Trees with some force, the
Dogs on one side and the Sled on the other, which gave us
some trouble to disentangle them; after a hurried day's
march down the mountain we came, on a Brook and camped
on the Snow, it being too deep to clear away.
January 1st. The weather bad, though mild, we continued
our descent, but steep only in two places, and at length came
on a tolerable level country; and camped at the junction of
two brooks; here Thomas came to us, he had, thank Heaven,
killed two Buck Moose Deer, very much wanted; I gave the
Men some Pemmecan for supper, and limited the quantity,
part of them grumbled, although they are sure that early
the morrow they will have two large deer to eat; in the last
thirty six hours they have devoured fifty six pounds of
pemmecan, being one fourth of all we have: we have
bring forward the Goods left on the Way; which they brought
except five pounds of Ball, which being in a leather bag was
carried away by a Wolverene.
Thus we continued day after day to march a few miles, as
the Snow was too wet and too deep to allow the dogs to make
any progress; on the 26th we put up on the banks of the
Columbia River, my Men had become so disheartened, sitting
down every half mile, and perfectly lost at all they saw around
them so utterly different from the east side of the Mountains,
four of them deserted to return back; and I was not
sorry to be rid of them, as for more than a month past they
had been very useless, in short they became an incumbrance
on me, and the other men were equally so to be rid of them;
having now taken up my residence for the rest of the winter
I may make my remarks on the countries and the climates
we have passed.
On the east side the snow is light and about two feet in
depth: on the west side which is open to the winds from the
Pacific Ocean and the distance short the snow loads the Mountains
and the low lands northward of about 150 miles below
the head o
The east side of the Mountains is formed of long slopes,
very few in this defile that are steep; but the west side is
more abrupt, and has many places that require steady sure
footed Horses, to descend it's banks in the open season: one
is tempted to enquire what may be the volume of water
contained in the immense quantities of snow brought to, and
lodged on, the Mountains, from the Pacific Ocean, and how
from an Ocean of salt water the immense evaporation constantly
going on is pure fresh water; these are mysterious
operations on a scale so vast that the human mind is lost in
the contemplation.